Hawaii statutes.
§128D-37 Oversight costs. (a) The
department's oversight costs shall be calculated at $100 for each hour of staff
time plus actual expenses incurred or one hundred twenty-five per cent of
actual cost when contracting for oversight services. If a requesting party is
a public or nonprofit agency, the director may reduce or waive this fee if the
director deems it to be in the public interest.

(b) The department shall provide each
requesting party or parties a summary of the oversight costs for the party's
specific site on an annual basis. [L 1997, c 377, pt of §2; am L 2005, c 133,
§5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next